District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.07

Water main taxes and rents to be uniform.

Water main taxes and water rents shall be uniform in said District.

History

June 10, 1879, 21 Stat. 9, ch. 16

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1507.
1973 Ed., § 43-1505.